Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.906

Construction of chapter—Certain agreements subject to RCW 28A.400.320.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to grant school district employers or classified school district employees the right to reach agreements that are in conflict with the termination provisions of RCW 28A.400.320.

[ 2009 c 396 s 11.]